Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 78

Emergency Communications Act of 1991

12-78-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the Emergency Communications Act of 1991.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 554, § 1.

12-78-102. Policy and purpose.

Because of the potential for a natural, technological, or national emergency-related disaster of catastrophic size and devastating impact requiring rapid and effective communications and warning to coordinate city, county, state, federal, and private sector emergency response personnel, equipment, and resources for the protection of lives, property, and institutions of the people of the state, and because technologically advanced state-of-the-art communications and data exchange equipment must be systematically procured, installed, and operated to ensure compatibility and effective use, it is found and declared to be necessary to provide:

For the periodic review of the statewide emergency communications system to ensure maximum operational effectiveness and recommend such improvements as may be required to keep pace with increasing emergency needs and advancing technology;

A system to review and recommend the procurement of equipment and systems to local offices of emergency services and to state, federal, and private sector emergency communications operators to ensure compatibility of equipment; and

A source of funding and administer funding made available from federal, state, and private sources to ensure prioritized, equitable, economical, and fair distribution of funding and to ensure all required fiscal controls and reviews are in compliance with appropriate state and federal guidelines.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 554, § 2.

12-78-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” or “local office of emergency management” shall refer to:

The state agency; and

Those jurisdictions authorized under the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, § 12-75-101 et seq., for the performance of emergency and disaster mitigation, planning, response, or recovery at the state and local level, respectively; and

“Emergency warning and communications systems” shall refer to the emergency communications nets operated under the control, management, supervision, and license of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management which may include local offices of emergency services, designated components of state or federal agencies, and duly accredited private sector organizations assigned to an emergency role under the provisions of the State of Arkansas Emergency Operations Plan.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 554, § 3.

12-78-104. Management of funds.

The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management shall ensure that a system to manage appropriated funds shall provide that:

Upon achieving operational status, the warning and communications shall be operated in accordance with the rules, regulations, and laws governing emergency warning and communications systems as promulgated by the Federal Communications Commission, Federal Emergency Management Agency, and the department;

Equipment shall be maintained in a continuing operational status by local offices of emergency management or the chief executive officer of the jurisdiction and by the responsible supervisor or manager of other recipients and the offices, jurisdictions, or agencies who shall provide supervision and training to those individuals designated to operate the equipment; and

Failure to maintain or operate the equipment in accordance with the minimum standards set forth in guidance by the department shall require repayment to the State Treasury that portion of the initial grant of state funds based upon a depreciation rate of fourteen percent (14%) per annum effective from the date of installation and acceptance.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” throughout this section.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 554, § 5; 1999, No. 646, § 43.

12-78-105. Implementation — Equipment purchases.

From funds appropriated therefor, the Division of Emergency Management shall provide to eligible local offices of emergency management and key state agencies assigned an emergency role under the State of Arkansas Emergency Operations Plan matching grants not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the acquisition of the emergency warning and communications equipment.

The grant shall be awarded only for the acquisition of equipment for which the Director of the Division of Emergency Management has granted specific approval.

The equipment shall be purchased only in accordance with the current approved purchasing procedures of the county or city having authority over the local office of emergency management or the approved purchasing procedures for the governmental agencies or private sector agencies.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a)(1) and (a)(2); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a)(1) and (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 1991, No. 917, § 10: Mar. 29, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that hazardous and toxic materials are being transported along our public streets and highways in Arkansas; that accidents and incidents involving the release of these hazardous and toxic materials periodically occur and threatens the public health and safety of the citizens of Arkansas; and that there is no current system of centralized reporting and response for these HAZMAT emergencies. Therefore, in order to create a centralized reporting to relieve the threat to the public health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 554, § 4; 1999, No. 646, § 44; 2019, No. 910, §
5909.